Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 176 Department of Highways
176.5067.
Motorcycle Safety Education Commission — Membership — Terms — Meetings — Commission attached to Office of Highway Safety within the Department of Highways for administrative purposes.

The Motorcycle Safety Education Commission is established as an independent body to help foster the growth and development of the motorcycle safety education program established under KRS

15A.350

.

The Motorcycle Safety Education Commission shall be composed of seven (7) members, appointed as follows:

One (1) representative of the Department of Kentucky State Police, appointed by the Governor;

One (1) representative of the Transportation Cabinet, appointed by the Governor;

One (1) instructor in the motorcycle safety education program, appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) members of the Kentucky Motorcycle Association, to be appointed by the Governor from a list of five (5) nominees selected by the association;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees selected by the President of the Senate; and

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees selected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Members of the Motorcycle Safety Education Commission shall serve a term of four (4) years. Sitting members shall be eligible to succeed themselves.

Commission members shall receive no compensation for their services and shall not be compensated for expenses incurred from travel or in connection with the performance of their duties as commission members.

The commission shall elect its chair and vice chair from its membership.

The commission shall meet quarterly or upon the call of the chair or the request of the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet.

The commission may take action only at meetings where a quorum is present.

The commission shall keep a record of its meetings and recommendations.

The commission shall be attached to the Office of Highway Safety within the Department of Highways for administrative purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 7, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 54, effective June 26, 2007; renumbered from KRS §

15A.362

by 2021 ch. 190, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

176.5068.
Responsibilities of Motorcycle Safety Education Commission.

The Motorcycle Safety Education Commission shall have the following responsibilities:

Approve any administrative regulation relating to the motorcycle safety education program promulgated by the cabinet prior to the administrative regulation being filed with the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;

Approve any proposal by the cabinet to contract for services pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A or any interagency agreement for services relating to the motorcycle safety education program prior to the issuance of the contract or the agreement;

Approve all expenditures of money relating to the motorcycle safety education program which has not been specifically authorized in the biennial budget;

Establish for the cabinet the short-range and long-range goals to promote the continued growth and expansion of the motorcycle safety education program;

Make recommendations regarding the administration of the motorcycle safety education program;

Ensure that the cabinet and the motorcycle safety education program is informed on the views and philosophies of interested parties; and

Act as a communication channel between the relevant state agencies and motorcyclists and the general public.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 8, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 55, effective June 26, 2007; renumbered from KRS §

15A.364

by 2021 ch. 190, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

176.5069.
Annual report — Submitted to Governor and Legislative Research Commission and available for public review.

The cabinet shall prepare an annual report on the program to be submitted to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission and made available to the public for review during the cabinet’s normal business hours. The report shall include:

The number and location of courses offered;

The number of:

Applicants that have applied to be instructors during the previous year;

Applicants approved to be instructors during the previous year; and

Active instructors during the previous year;

The number of students that registered for the various courses and the number of students that completed the various courses successfully;

The number of permits, licenses, and registrations issued;

The amount of money collected by category for permits, licenses, and registrations;

Other information about program implementation as the cabinet shall deem appropriate; and

An assessment of the overall impact of the program on motorcycle safety in the state.

The report shall also provide a complete accounting of revenue receipts of the motorcycle safety education program fund and of all moneys expended under the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 9, effective July 1, 2005; renumbered from KRS §

15A.366

by 2021 ch. 190, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

176.510.
Off-road Motorcycle and ATV Commission established — Purpose. [Repealed.]

176.511.
Membership of Off-road Motorcycle and ATV Commission — Meetings — Records. [Repealed.]

176.520.
Location of construction waste sites.

Waste sites identified in KRS

176.050

shall be on property owned by the state or a city, county, or other governmental agency and have the potential to be turned into industrial parks under the provisions of KRS

176.050

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 181, § 2, effective March 27, 1998.

176.525.
Use of identified potential industrial park sites as construction waste sites — Deeding of site to local government — Consultation with local government officials in site identification.

During the construction phase of a new road construction project, potential industrial park sites identified during the design phase shall be used as waste sites by the department or the contractor who was awarded the project. Waste shall include, but not be limited, to nonhazardous nonsoluble construction material, steel, concrete, brick, asphalt, rock, dirt, or other fill material, but shall not include vegetation resulting from land clearing and grubbing, utility line maintenance, seasonal and storm-related cleanup, or any hazardous material or hazardous waste as defined in KRS

174.405

.

The purpose of using the site as a repository for waste is to reduce the cost associated with the road project and to level or otherwise create a site sufficient to support industrial activities. The department or the department’s contractor shall use stabilization methods to reduce significant differential settling of the waste. The department or the department’s contractor shall continually grade and compact the waste site, and design surface contours to minimize water run-off, until the site is stable, final grading is complete, and the site is ready for building to begin on an industrial park.

If a waste site is owned by the state, the state shall deed in fee simple the area used as a waste site to an interested city, county, or other governmental agency upon completion of the highway project after the final pay estimate has been processed.

The department shall consult with the appropriate elected officials affected by new routes proposed to be constructed in the six (6) year road plan. The department shall consult with the appropriate elected officials to identify waste sites along the proposed new routes that may be potential industrial park sites.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 181, § 3, effective March 27, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 22, effective June 25, 2009.

176.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

176.122

to

176.128

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall upon conviction be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Each day in which work is performed or materials furnished in violation of the provisions of KRS

176.122

to

176.128

shall constitute a separate offense.

In addition to any other penalties provided in this section, any officer, agent or employee of the department who performs work or services beyond the right-of-way limits of public road or any person who accepts such work or services shall reimburse the department for all costs of the work or services performed and for any materials which shall have been used in the performance of the work or services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 154, §§ 4, 5.

176.991.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully burns, defaces or destroys a covered bridge designated as a state shrine by the Kentucky Heritage Commission or by the heritage division shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or confined in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days or more than six (6) months or both. This shall be in addition to other penalties.

Any person who exceeds the posted weight limits for a covered wooden bridge designated as a state shrine shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) or more than five hundred dollars ($500). This shall be in addition to other penalties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 364, § 3; 1976, ch. 170, § 3; 1982, ch. 396, § 47, effective July 15, 1982.